Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2510
Jurisdiction by act of decedent.

In addition to jurisdiction conferred by section 30-2509, a foreign personal representative is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to the same extent that his decedent was subject to jurisdiction immediately prior to death.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 216, UPC § 4-302.